Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.22.080

Accounts of married persons.

A financial institution may enter into a contract of deposit without regard to whether the depositor is married and without regard as to whether the funds on deposit are the community or separate property of the depositor.

[ 1981 c 192 s 8. Formerly RCW 30.22.080.]